Georgia, session 2025_26, HB242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-11-34.2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to disorderly
or disruptive conduct at any funeral or memorial service, is amended by revising subsection
(a) and the introductory language of subsection (b) as follows:
"(a) The General Assembly declares that the interest of persons in planning, participating
in, and attending a religious worship or observance, or a funeral or memorial service for
a deceased relative or loved one, without unwanted impediment, disruption, disturbance,
or interference is a substantial interest and the General Assembly further recognizes the
need to impose content neutral time, place, and manner restrictions on unwanted acts
carried out with the intent to impede, disrupt, disturb, or interfere with such funeral
worship, observance, funeral, or memorial service.
H. B. 242 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 48 1501S
(b) It shall be unlawful to engage in any disorderly or disruptive conduct with the intent
to impede, disrupt, disturb, or interfere with the orderly conduct of any religious worship
or observance, or a funeral or memorial service, or with the normal activities and functions
carried on in the facilities or buildings where such funeral worship, observance, funeral,
or memorial service is taking place. Any or all of the following shall constitute such
disorderly or disruptive conduct:"
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 242 (SUB)
- 2 -